District of Columbia statutes.
7-761.12

Family Support Council.

(a)

The Director shall establish a Family Support Council to assist, within available appropriations, the Department and other agencies to develop systems of support for families throughout the lifespans of their family members with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

(b)

The Family Support Council shall be composed of 11 members, of whom the majority shall be people with developmental disabilities and their family members.

(c)

No later than one year following February 26, 2015, the Department shall publish operating procedures for the Family Support Council, and the Director shall appoint the initial Family Support Council members.

History

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-264, § 112
as added Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 5002(e), 61 DCR 9990

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5002(e) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5002(e) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5002(e) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).